District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.93

Rules.

The Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this part.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 14, 55 DCR 6261
Delegation of Rulemaking Authority to the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities and Banking under the District of Columbia Medical Liability Captive Insurance Agency Establishment Act of 2008, see Mayor’s Order 2010-161, October 15, 2010 ( 57 DCR 9819).